Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1560
Litter fee; manufacturer; wholesaler; products subject to; enumerated.

The fee imposed by section 81-1559 shall be calculated only on the value of products or the gross proceeds of sales of products which directly contribute to litter as defined in section 81-1541 and which fall into the following categories: (1) Food for human or pet consumption; (2) groceries; (3) cigarettes and other tobacco products; (4) soft drinks and carbonated waters; (5) liquor, wine, and beer and other malt beverages; (6) household paper and paper products, excluding magazines, periodicals, newspapers, and literary works; (7) glass containers; (8) metal containers; (9) plastic or fiber containers made of synthetic material; and (10) cleaning agents and toiletries.

Laws 1979, LB 120, § 27;

Laws 1981, LB 253, § 20.
September 30, 2030